Hawaii statutes.
[§28-13] Antitrust trust fund. (a)
There is established in the state treasury the antitrust trust fund, into which
shall be deposited:

(1) Ten per cent of any antitrust judgment or
settlement received by the State except where the deposit is inconsistent with
the court order or settlement agreement relating to the amount; and

(2) Appropriations made by the legislature.

(b) The antitrust trust fund shall be
administered by the department of the attorney general and shall be used for
expenditures relating to the enforcement of antitrust laws, including but not
limited to expenditures for training, equipment purchases, educational
resources, and facilitating participation in antitrust lawsuits and
investigations initiated by other states.

(c) All unencumbered and unexpended moneys in
excess of $250,000 remaining on balance in the antitrust trust fund at the
close of June 30 of each year shall lapse to the credit of the general fund.

(d) The department of the attorney general
shall submit a report to the legislature no later than twenty days prior to the
convening of each regular session to provide an accounting of the receipts and
expenditures of the fund. [L 2001, c 97, §2]

Previous
Vol01_Ch0001-0042F
Next